csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_Cw.yaml
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaawagen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhwaawegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawaden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaawaden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogosiigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwaawangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwaawangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawinden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mizhwaawinden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogosig
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogod
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwag
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwag
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogosig
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogod
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwind
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mizhond
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogosigoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogopan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwagiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwagiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mizhwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwadiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mizhwadiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogosigoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mizhogopan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mizhwangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mizhwangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwindiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mizhondiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogosiiwaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogowaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mizhosiiwaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mizhowaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mizhosiiwaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mizhowaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mizhosiiwangidwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mizhowangidwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mizhosiiwangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mizhowangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: mizhogoosiiwaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: mizhogoowaangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogosiwaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogoyaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mizhosiwaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mizhoyaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mizhosiwaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mizhoyaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mizhosiwangidwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mizhoyangidwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mizhosiwangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mizhoyangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: mizhogoosiwaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: mizhogooyaang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogosiwaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mizhogoyaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mizhosiwaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mizhoyaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mizhosiwaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mizhoyaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mizhosiwangidwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mizhoyangidwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mizhosiwangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mizhoyangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: mizhogoosiwaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: mizhogooyaangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogosiiwangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogowangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mizhosiinowangwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mizhonowangwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mizhosiinowangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mizhonowangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: mizhogoosiiwangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: mizhogoowangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogosiwang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogoyang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mizhosinowangwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mizhonangwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mizhosinowang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mizhonang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: mizhogoosiwang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: mizhogooyang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogosiwangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mizhogoyangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mizhosinowangwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mizhonangwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mizhosinowangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mizhonangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: mizhogoosiwangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: mizhogooyangiban
